California, session 20252026, AB1533.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The sum of six hundred seventy-two dollars ($672) is hereby appropriated to the Department of General Services for the payment of claims accepted by the Government Claims Program in accordance with the schedule set forth in subdivision (b).(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), claims accepted by the Department of General Services shall be paid in accordance with the following schedule:Total for Fund: General Fund (0001) ........................ $600.00Total for Fund: Motor Vehicle Account (0044) ........................ $72.00Total for Fund: Item 0521-001-0044SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to pay claims against the state and end hardship to claimants as quickly as possible, it is necessary that this bill go into immediate effect.